Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 2
UNIFORM VETERANS' GUARDIANSHIP LAW

28-5-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act".

Source:

L. 45:

p. 660, § 21.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (21).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-21.

28-5-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the administrator of veterans' affairs of the United States or his or her successor.

"Benefits" means all moneys paid or payable by the United States through the veterans administration.

"Estate" means income on hand and assets acquired partially or wholly with income.

"Guardian" means any fiduciary for the person or estate of a ward.

"Income" means moneys received from the veterans administration and revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially acquired therewith.

"Person" means an individual, a partnership, a corporation, or an association.

"Veterans administration" means the veterans administration, its predecessors, or its successors.

"Ward" means a beneficiary of the veterans administration.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 652, § 1.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (1).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 621, § 125, effective May 24.

28-5-203. Administrator as party in interest.

The administrator shall be a party in interest in any proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian or for the removal of the disability of minority or mental incapacity of a ward and in any suit or other proceeding affecting in any manner the administration by the guardian of the estate of any present or former ward whose estate includes assets derived in whole or in part from benefits paid by the veterans administration. Not less than fifteen days prior to hearing in such matter, notice in writing of the time and place thereof shall be given by mail, unless waived in writing, to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which any such suit or any such proceeding is pending.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 653, § 2.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (2).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-2.

28-5-204. Guardian appointed when necessary.

When, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the veterans administration, it is necessary, prior to payment of benefits, that a guardian be appointed, the appointment may be made in the manner provided in this part 2.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 653, § 3.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (3).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-3.

28-5-205. Limitation on number of wards.

No person other than a bank or trust company shall be guardian of more than five wards at one time, unless all the wards are members of one family. Upon presentation of a petition by an attorney of the veterans administration or other interested person alleging that a guardian is acting in a fiduciary capacity for more than five wards as provided in this section and requesting his or her discharge for that reason, the court, upon proof substantiating the petition, shall require a final accounting forthwith from such guardian and shall discharge him or her from guardianships in excess of five and forthwith appoint a successor.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 653, § 4.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (4).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 621, § 126, effective May 24.

28-5-206. Appointment of guardian - petition.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any relative or friend of the ward or by any person who is authorized by law to file a petition. If there is no person so authorized or if the person so authorized refuses or fails to file such a petition within thirty days after mailing of notice by the veterans administration to the last known address of the person, if any, indicating the necessity for the same, a petition for appointment may be filed by any resident of this state.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, and place of residence of the ward, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that the ward is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the veterans administration and shall set forth the amount of money then due and the amount of probable future payments.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation, and address of the proposed guardian, and if the nominee is a natural person, the number of wards for whom the nominee is presently acting as guardian. Notwithstanding any law as to priority of persons entitled to appointment or the nomination in the petition, the court may appoint some other individual or a bank or trust company as guardian if the court determines it is for the best interest of the ward.

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward, the petition shall show that such ward has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 653, § 5.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (5).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-5.

28-5-207. Evidence of necessity for guardian of infant.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a minor, a certificate of the administrator or his or her authorized representative setting forth the age of such minor as shown by the records of the veterans administration and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the veterans administration shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 654, § 6.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (6).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 622, § 127, effective May 24.

28-5-208. Evidence of necessity for guardian for incompetent.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the administrator or his or her duly authorized representative that such person has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration and that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due such ward by the veterans administration shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 654, § 7.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (7).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-7.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 622, § 128, effective May 24.

28-5-209. Notice of filing petition.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian under this part 2, notice shall be given to the ward and to such other persons in such manner as is provided by the laws of this state, and also to the veterans administration as provided by this part 2.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 654, § 8.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (8).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-8.

28-5-210. Bond of guardian.

Upon the appointment of a guardian, he or she shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the estimated value of the personal estate and anticipated income of the ward during the ensuing year. The bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians appointed under the general guardianship laws of this state. The court may from time to time require the guardian to file an additional bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian with personal sureties, there shall be at least two such sureties, and they shall file with the court a certificate under oath which describes the property owned, both real and personal, and shall state that each is worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all his or her debts and liabilities and the aggregate of other bonds on which he or she is principal or surety and exclusive of property exempt from execution. The court may require additional security or may require a corporate surety bond, the premium thereon to be paid from the ward's estate.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 654, § 9.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (9).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-9.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 129, § 622, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the terms and conditions of the bond of a guardian or conservator, see § 15-14-416.

28-5-211. Accounts of securities - notices and hearings.

Every guardian who has received or who shall receive on account of his or her ward any moneys or other thing of value from the veterans administration shall file with the court annually, on the anniversary date of the appointment, in addition to such other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true, and accurate account under oath of all moneys or other things of value so received by him or her, all earnings, interest, or profits derived therefrom, and all property acquired therewith and of all disbursements therefrom, and showing the balance thereof in his or her hands at the date of the account and how invested.

The guardian, at the time of filing any account, shall exhibit all securities or investments held by him or her to an officer of the bank or other depository wherein said securities or investments are held for safekeeping, or to an authorized representative of the corporation which is surety on his or her bond, or to the judge or clerk of a court of record in this state, or, upon request of the guardian or other interested party, to any other reputable person designated by the court, who shall certify in writing that he or she has examined the securities or investments and identified them with those described in the account and shall note any omissions or discrepancies. If the depository is the guardian, the certifying officer shall not be the officer verifying the account. That certificate and the certificate of an official of the bank in which are deposited any funds for which the guardian is accountable, showing the amount on deposit, shall be prepared and signed in duplicate, and one of each shall be filed by the guardian with his or her account.

At the time of filing in the court any account, a certified copy thereof and a signed duplicate of each certificate filed with the court shall be sent by the guardian to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located. A signed duplicate or a certified copy of any petition, motion, or other pleading pertaining to an account or to any matter other than an account and which is filed in the guardianship proceedings shall be furnished by the person filing the same to the proper office of the veterans administration. Unless hearing is waived in writing by the attorney of the veterans administration and by all other persons, if any, entitled to notice, including the surety on the guardian's bond, the court shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the account, petition, motion, or other pleading not less than fifteen days nor more than thirty days from the date same is filed, unless a different available date is stipulated in writing. Unless waived in writing, written notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given the veterans administration office concerned and the guardian and any others entitled to notice not less than fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. The notice may be given by mail, in which event it shall be deposited in the mails not less than fifteen days prior to said date. The court or clerk thereof shall mail to said veterans administration office a copy of each order entered in any guardianship proceeding wherein the administrator is an interested party.

If the guardian is accountable for property derived from sources other than the veterans administration, he or she shall be accountable as is or may be required under the applicable law of this state pertaining to the property of minors or persons of unsound mind who are not beneficiaries of the veterans administration and as to such other property shall be entitled to the compensation provided by such law. The account for other property may be combined with the account filed in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 655, § 10.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (10).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-10.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 622, § 130, effective May 24.

28-5-212. Penalty for failure to account.

If any guardian fails to file with the court any account as required by this part 2, or by an order of the court, when any account is due or within thirty days after citation issues as provided by law, or fails to furnish the veterans administration a true copy of any account, petition, or pleading as required by this part 2, such failure may in the discretion of the court be a ground for his or her removal.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 656, § 11.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (11).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-11.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 623, § 131, effective May 24.

28-5-213. Compensation of guardians.

Compensation payable to guardians shall be based upon services rendered and shall not exceed five percent of the amount of income received during the period covered by the account; except that such percentage compensation shall not be allowed on the moneys or other assets received from a prior guardian nor upon the amount received from liquidation of loans or other investments. In the event five percent of income received during the period would be less than twenty-five dollars and the personal property in the estate totals not more than one thousand five hundred dollars, twenty-five dollars may be taken as the guardian's compensation. If the personal property in the estate exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars and five percent of the income would be less than fifty dollars, the guardian's compensation may be fifty dollars. In any case in which the compensation under the foregoing appropriate rates is inadequate because of extra services performed, the court, upon petition and hearing thereon, may authorize reasonable additional compensation. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing thereon shall be given the proper office of the veterans administration in the manner provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 656, § 12.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (12).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-12.

L. 65:

p. 1232, § 1.

28-5-214. Investments.

Every guardian shall invest the surplus funds of his or her ward's estate in such securities or property as authorized under the laws of this state, but only upon prior order of the court; except that the funds may be invested, without prior court authorization, in direct unconditional interest-bearing obligations of this state or of the United States and in obligations the interest and principal of which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States. A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition for authority to invest shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration, and notice of hearing thereon shall be given said office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 657, § 13.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (13).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-13.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 623, § 132, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For fiduciary investments, see part 3 of article 1 of title 15.

28-5-215. Maintenance and support.

A guardian shall not apply any portion of the income or the estate for the support or maintenance of any person other than the ward, except upon petition to and prior order of the court after a hearing. A signed duplicate or certified copy of said petition shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration, and notice of hearing thereon shall be given said office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 657, § 14.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (14).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-14.

28-5-216. Purchase of home for ward.

The court may authorize the purchase of the entire fee simple title to real estate in this state in which the guardian has no interest, but only as a home for the ward, or to protect his or her interest, or as a home for his or her dependent family. Such purchase of real estate shall not be made except upon the entry of an order of the court after hearing upon verified petition. A copy of the petition shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration, and notice of hearing thereon shall be given said office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account.

Before authorizing such investment, the court shall require written evidence of value and of title and of the advisability of acquiring such real estate. Title shall be taken in the ward's name. This section does not limit the right of the guardian on behalf of his or her ward to bid and to become the purchaser of real estate at a sale thereof pursuant to decree of foreclosure of lien held by or for the ward, or at a trustee's sale, to protect the ward's right in the property so foreclosed or sold; nor does it limit the right of the guardian, if such is necessary to protect the ward's interest and upon prior order of the court in which the guardianship is pending, to agree with cotenants of the ward for a partition in kind, or to purchase from cotenants the entire undivided interests held by them, or to bid and purchase the same at a sale under a partition decree, or to compromise adverse claims of title to the ward's realty.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 657, § 15.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (15).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-15.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 624, § 133, effective May 24.

28-5-217. Copies of public records to be furnished.

When a copy of any public record is required by the veterans administration to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in benefits made available by the veterans administration, the official custodian of such public record, without charge, shall provide the applicant for such benefits or any person acting on his or her behalf or the authorized representative of the veterans administration with a certified copy of such record.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 658, § 16.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (16).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-16.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 624, § 134, effective May 24.

28-5-218. Discharge of guardian - release of sureties.

A certificate by the veterans administration showing that a minor has attained majority or that an adult ward has been rated competent by the veterans administration upon examination made in accordance with the law shall be prima facie evidence that the minor has attained majority or that the adult ward's property no longer requires court supervision. Upon hearing after notice as provided by this part 2 and the entry of a record determination by the court that the guardianship is to be dispensed with, the guardian shall be directed by the court to file a final account. Upon hearing after notice to the former ward and to the veterans administration as in case of other accounts, upon approval of the final account and upon delivery to the ward of the assets due him or her from the guardian, the guardian shall be discharged and his or her sureties released.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 658, § 17.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (17).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-17.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 624, § 135, effective May 24.

28-5-219. Record not construed as legal adjudication.

Neither the fact that a person has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration nor the fact that a guardian has been appointed for a person under the provisions of this part 2 shall be construed as a legal adjudication of insanity or mental incompetency, unless such person also is or has been adjudicated insane or mentally incompetent by a state court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 658, § 18.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (18).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-18.

28-5-220. Certification or commitment to veterans administration.

When, in any proceeding under the laws of this state for the commitment or certification of a person alleged to have a mental health disorder or otherwise be in need of confinement in a hospital or other institution for his or her proper care, it is determined after such adjudication of the status of such person as may be required by law that commitment or certification to a hospital for treatment of mental health disorders or other institution is necessary for safekeeping or treatment and it appears that the person is eligible for care or treatment by the veterans administration, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the veterans administration showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment therein, may commit or certify the person to the veterans administration. Upon commitment or certification, the person, when admitted to any facility operated by such agency within or without this state, is subject to the rules and regulations of the veterans administration. The chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration to which the person is committed or certified, with respect to the person committed or certified, is vested with the same powers as superintendents of state hospitals for mental health disorders within this state with respect to retention of custody, transfer, parole, or discharge as restored to reason.

The judgment or order of certification or commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia certifying or committing a person to the veterans administration for care or treatment has the same force and effect as to the person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which the court entering the judgment or making the order is situated; and the courts of the certifying or committing state or of the District of Columbia are deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so certified or committed for the purpose of inquiring into the person's mental health and of determining the necessity for continuance of his or her restraint. Consent is given to the application of the law of the certifying or committing state or district in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration to retain custody or transfer, parole, or discharge the person.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the veterans administration that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person committed or certified to any hospital for persons with mental health disorders or other institution for the care or treatment of persons similarly afflicted and that the person is eligible for care or treatment, the court having jurisdiction may cause him or her to be transferred to the veterans administration for care or treatment. Any person transferred as provided in this section is deemed to be committed or certified to the veterans administration for all purposes as provided in subsection (1) of this section as on original commitment or certification.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 659, § 19.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (19).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-19.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 624, § 136, effective May 24.

L. 2017:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1377, § 297, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 285, § 14, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

28-5-221. Liberal construction.

This part 2 shall be so construed to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 660, § 20.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (20).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-20.

28-5-222. Repeal and modification of prior laws.

Except where inconsistent with this part 2, the laws of this state relating to guardian and ward and the judicial practice relating thereto shall be applicable to such beneficiaries and their estates.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 660, § 23.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (22).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-22.

28-5-223. Application.

The provisions of this part 2 relating to surety bonds and the administration of estates of wards shall apply to all "income" and "estate" as defined in section 28-5-202, whether the guardian has been appointed under this part 2 or under any other law of this state, special or general, prior or subsequent to the enactment of this part 2.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 660, § 24.

CSA:

C. 150, § 55 (23).

CRS 53:

§ 143-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-3-23.